Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-60] No false or misleading
information. It shall be unlawful for any person or person's agent to
testify falsely or make a material misstatement of fact before the commission
or to file with the commission any document required by this chapter that is
false, contains a material misstatement of fact, or that contains forgery. All
documents shall be true, complete, and accurate in all respects, including the
developer's public report, prepared by or for the developer and submitted to
the commission in connection with the developer's registration of the project,
and all information contained in the documents, and shall not contain any
misleading information, or omit any pertinent change in the information or
documents submitted to the commission. [L 2005, c 93, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next